Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1114.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Maricopa county attorney's office; behavioral health patient brokering The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer for distribution to the Maricopa county attorney's office for investigations relating to behavioral health patient brokering.